Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE D. JUDICIAL PERSONNEL AND OFFICIALS

CHAPTER 53. BAILIFFS

SUBCHAPTER A. BAILIFFS FOR CERTAIN COURTS

Sec. 53.001. MANDATORY APPOINTMENTS. (a) The judges of the 30th, 70th, 71st, 78th, 89th, 161st, and 341st district courts, the judges of the district courts having jurisdiction in Taylor County, the judges of the county courts at law of Taylor County, and the judge of the County Court of Harrison County shall each appoint a bailiff.

(b) A district or statutory county court judge in Nueces County shall appoint a bailiff.

(c) Each criminal district court in Tarrant County must have at least three bailiffs assigned regularly to the court. Each judge of a criminal district court in Tarrant County shall appoint two officers of the court to serve as bailiffs for his court.

(d) The judge of the 97th District Court shall appoint a bailiff for each county in the district. At the discretion of the judge, a bailiff may serve the court in more than one county of the district.

(e) The county sheriff shall appoint one bailiff for each district court in Tarrant County that gives preference to criminal cases and one bailiff for each criminal district court in Tarrant County in the same manner as authorized by law.

(f) The appointment of a bailiff under this chapter does not affect the requirement under general law that the county sheriff furnish a bailiff for each court.

(g) The judges of the district courts having jurisdiction in Potter and Randall counties and the judges of the county courts at law in Potter and Randall counties shall each appoint a bailiff.

(h) The judges of the district courts having jurisdiction in Angelina County and the judges of the county courts at law of Angelina County shall each appoint a bailiff.

(i) The judge of the 406th District Court shall appoint a bailiff.

(j) The judge of the 115th District Court shall appoint a bailiff to serve the court only in Upshur County.

(k) The judges of the 244th, 358th, and 446th district courts shall each appoint a bailiff.

(l) The judge of the 271st District Court and the judges of the county courts at law in Wise County shall each appoint a bailiff.

(m) The judges of the 5th, 102nd, and 202nd district courts and the judges of the county courts at law of Bowie County shall appoint one or more bailiffs to serve the courts in Bowie County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.29(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 8.03(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 401, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 546, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 868, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 853, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 932, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1136, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 575, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 1(d), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 272), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 3972), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 20(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2310), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 6.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 2174), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(20), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 53.002. PERMISSIVE APPOINTMENTS. (a) The judges of the 34th, 86th, 130th, 142nd, 238th, 318th, 355th, and 385th district courts may each appoint a bailiff.

(b) The judge of the 43rd District Court and the judge of the 415th District Court may each appoint one or more bailiffs that the judge believes are necessary for the efficient administration of the judge's court.

(c) The judges of the district courts, including family district courts, having jurisdiction in El Paso County and the judges of the county courts at law in El Paso County may each appoint a person to serve the court as bailiff. A bailiff for a district court that is composed of more than one county serves the court in each county of the district.

(d) The judges of the 15th, 59th, and 397th district courts and the judges of the statutory county courts in Grayson County may each appoint a bailiff.

(e) The judges of the district courts in Tom Green County may each appoint a bailiff. A bailiff for a district court that is composed of more than one county may, at the discretion of the judge, serve the court in each county of the district.

(f) The judges of the 12th, 106th, 229th, 258th, 278th, 381st, and 411th district courts may each appoint a bailiff. At the discretion of the judge, a bailiff may serve the court in each county of the district.

(g) The judge of each district court in Tarrant County that gives preference to criminal cases and the judge of each criminal district court in Tarrant County may appoint two persons to serve as bailiffs. Notwithstanding Section 53.071 or Article 19A.301, Code of Criminal Procedure, the district judges of the courts in Tarrant County that give preference to criminal cases and the criminal district courts in Tarrant County may appoint one bailiff for each grand jury.

(h) The judge of the 84th District Court may appoint a bailiff to serve the court in Hansford and Hutchinson counties.

(i) The local administrative judge of the district courts in Comal County may appoint two or more bailiffs to serve the district courts in Comal County as the judge determines necessary for the efficient operation of the district courts, subject to the approval of a majority of the district judges of those courts. A majority of the district judges of those courts may remove a bailiff appointed under this subsection. The local administrative judge may not appoint more than two bailiffs under this subsection unless the funding for the additional bailiffs is approved by the commissioners court of Comal County before the appointment. A bailiff appointed under this subsection is entitled to the salary recommended by the local administrative judge, subject to the approval of the commissioners court.

(j) The local administrative judge of the district courts in Hays County may appoint two or more bailiffs to serve the district courts in Hays County as the judge determines necessary for the efficient operation of the district courts, subject to the approval of a majority of the district judges of those courts. A majority of the district judges of those courts may remove a bailiff appointed under this subsection. The local administrative judge may not appoint more than two bailiffs under this subsection unless the funding for the additional bailiffs is approved by the commissioners court of Hays County before the appointment. A bailiff appointed under this subsection is entitled to the salary recommended by the local administrative judge, subject to the approval of the commissioners court.

(k) The local administrative judge of the district courts in Caldwell County may appoint two or more bailiffs to serve the district courts in Caldwell County as the judge determines necessary for the efficient operation of the district courts, subject to the approval of a majority of the district judges of those courts. A majority of the district judges of those courts may remove a bailiff appointed under this subsection. The local administrative judge may not appoint more than two bailiffs under this subsection unless the funding for the additional bailiffs is approved by the commissioners court of Caldwell County before the appointment. A bailiff appointed under this subsection is entitled to the salary recommended by the local administrative judge, subject to the approval of the commissioners court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 759, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 919, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 430, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 648, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 868, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1436, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 853, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 121, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 928, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 4 (S.B. 234), Sec. 1, eff. April 27, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 3(b), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 632), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 890 (S.B. 2554), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2310), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 905 (H.B. 1193), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.39, eff. January 1, 2021.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 7.04, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 53.003. EVIDENCE OF APPOINTMENT; NOTIFICATION. (a) An order signed by the appointing judge entered in the minutes of the court is evidence of the appointment of a bailiff or grand jury bailiff under Section 53.001(a), (d), or (g) or 53.002(a), (c), (d), (e), or (f).

(b) The judge of each court listed in Sections 53.001(d) and 53.002(a), (c), (e), and (f), the judge of the 341st District Court, the judge of each district court in Tarrant County that gives preference to criminal cases, and the judge of each criminal district court in Tarrant County shall give each commissioners court in the judicial district written notification of the bailiff's or grand jury bailiff's appointment and date of employment. The judge of each court listed in Section 53.002(c), the judge of each district court in Tarrant County that gives preference to criminal cases, and the judge of each criminal district court in Tarrant County shall also give each commissioners court written notification of the compensation to be paid by the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.29(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 759, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 919, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 8.03(b), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 401, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 648, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 868, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 853, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 53.004. QUALIFICATIONS. (a) A bailiff in the 34th or 71st district court must be a resident of the county in which the bailiff serves the court and must be at least 18 years old.

(b) To be eligible to be appointed bailiff in the 30th, 78th, 86th, 89th, 130th, or 341st district court, the County Court of Harrison County, a court described in Section 53.002(c), a district court in Taylor County, or a county court at law of Taylor County, a person must be a resident of the county in which the person serves the court and must be at least 21 years old.

(c) A bailiff in the 15th, 59th, or 397th district court or a statutory county court in Grayson County must be a citizen of the United States.

(d) To be eligible to be appointed a bailiff in a district court in Tom Green County, a person must be a resident of the judicial district and must be at least 18 years of age.

(e) To be eligible to be appointed bailiff in a district court in Midland County, for the 355th District Court, or under Section 53.001(g), a person must be at least 21 years old and hold a peace officer license under Chapter 1701, Occupations Code, from the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement. This subsection does not apply to a person serving as bailiff of a court described by Section 53.001(g) on September 1, 1991.

(f) To be eligible to be appointed bailiff in the 406th District Court, a person must be:

(1) at least 21 years of age; and

(2) a citizen of the United States.

(g) A bailiff appointed by the judge of the 115th District Court to serve the court in Upshur County must be:

(1) a resident of that county; and

(2) at least 18 years of age.

(h) A bailiff in the 70th, 161st, 244th, or 358th district court must be:

(1) a resident of the county in which the bailiff serves the court;

(2) at least 18 years of age; and

(3) a citizen of the United States.

(i) A bailiff in the 271st District Court or a county court at law in Wise County must be:

(1) at least 21 years of age; and

(2) a citizen of the United States.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.29(c), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 759, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 919, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 8.03(c), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 401, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 385, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 430, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 868, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 853, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 10 (S.B. 235), Sec. 1, eff. May 3, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 1(e), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 272), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 3972), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 20(b), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 890 (S.B. 2554), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2310), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.20, eff. May 18, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 6.02, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 7.05, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 53.005. TERM OF OFFICE. A bailiff or grand jury bailiff appointed under this subchapter holds office at the will of the judge of the court that the bailiff or grand jury bailiff serves.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.29(d), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 53.006. DUTIES. (a) A bailiff or grand jury bailiff appointed under Section 53.001 or 53.002(a), (c), (d), (e), or (f) is an officer of the court.

(b) The bailiff or grand jury bailiff shall perform in the court to which the bailiff or grand jury bailiff is appointed all duties imposed on bailiffs under general law and shall perform other duties required by the judge of the court that the bailiff or grand jury bailiff serves.

(c) A bailiff or grand jury bailiff appointed under Section 53.001(d) or 53.002(a), (c), (e), (f), or (g) by the judge of the 341st District Court, by a judge of a district court in Tarrant County that gives preference to criminal cases, or by a judge of a criminal district court in Tarrant County has only the duties assigned by the judge of the court that the bailiff or grand jury bailiff serves.

(d) A bailiff appointed under Section 53.001(b) shall serve as part of the security force for the district and statutory county courts in the county and shall perform other duties as required by the judge of the court the bailiff serves.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.29(e), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 759, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 919, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 8.03(d), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 546, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 648, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 868, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 853, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 53.007. BAILIFF DEPUTIZED. (a) This section applies to:

(1) the 34th, 70th, 71st, 86th, 97th, 130th, 142nd, 161st, 238th, 244th, 318th, 341st, 355th, 358th, 385th, and 446th district courts;

(2) the County Court of Harrison County;

(3) the criminal district courts of Tarrant County;

(4) the district courts in Taylor County;

(5) the courts described in Section 53.002(c), (d), (e), or (f);

(6) the county courts at law of Taylor County;

(7) the district courts in Tarrant County that give preference to criminal cases;

(8) the 115th District Court in Upshur County; and

(9) the 5th, 102nd, and 202nd district courts and the county courts at law of Bowie County.

(b) On the request of the judge of a court to which this section applies other than the 115th District Court, the sheriff of each county in which the court sits shall deputize the bailiff or grand jury bailiff appointed under this subchapter of that court, in addition to other deputies authorized by law. On the request of the judge of the 115th District Court, the sheriff of Upshur County shall deputize the bailiff appointed by that judge under Section 53.001(j), in addition to other deputies authorized by law.

(c) A request under this section by a judge of a court listed in Section 53.001(d), 53.002(a), 53.002(c), or 53.002(e), by the judge of the 341st District Court, by a judge of a district court in Tarrant County that gives preference to criminal cases, by a judge of a criminal district court in Tarrant County, by the judge of a district court in Taylor County, or by the judge of a county court at law of Taylor County must be in writing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.29(f), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 759, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 919, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 8.03(e), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 430, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 648, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 868, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1436, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 853, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 3972), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 20(c), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 890 (S.B. 2554), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2310), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 6.03, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 2174), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Text of section effective until January 01, 2025

Sec. 53.0071. BAILIFF AS PEACE OFFICER. Unless the appointing judge provides otherwise in the order of appointment, a bailiff appointed under Section 53.001(b), (g), (k), or (m) or 53.002(c), (e), or (f) is a "peace officer" for purposes of Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 919, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 401, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 546, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 648, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 6.04, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 2174), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.002(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.064, eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on January 01, 2025

Sec. 53.0071. BAILIFF AS PEACE OFFICER. Unless the appointing judge provides otherwise in the order of appointment, a bailiff appointed under Section 53.001(b), (g), (k), or (m) or 53.002(c), (e), or (f) is a "peace officer" for purposes of Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 919, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 401, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 546, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 648, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 6.04, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 2174), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.002(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.064, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 53.008. OATH. The bailiffs of the 34th, 70th, 86th, 97th, 130th, 142nd, 161st, 238th, 244th, 271st, 318th, 341st, 355th, 358th, 385th, and 446th district courts, the bailiffs of the courts described in Section 53.002(c), (d), (e), or (f), the bailiffs and the grand jury bailiffs of the district courts in Tarrant County that give preference to criminal cases, the bailiffs and grand jury bailiffs of the criminal district courts in Tarrant County, the bailiffs of the district courts in Taylor County, the bailiffs of the county courts at law of Taylor County, and the bailiffs of the county courts at law of Wise County shall each swear to the following oath, to be administered by the judge: "I solemnly swear that I will faithfully and impartially perform all duties as may be required of me by law, so help me God."

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.29(g), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 759, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 919, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 8.03(f), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 430, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 648, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 868, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1436, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 853, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 890 (S.B. 2554), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2310), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 6.05, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 53.009. COMPENSATION. (a) Each bailiff appointed by a judge of the 30th, 78th, 89th, or 355th district court, by a district judge in Potter, Randall, or Taylor County, or by a judge of a county court at law of Potter, Randall, or Taylor County is entitled to receive a salary set by the judge and approved by the commissioners court. The salary is paid out of the general fund of the county, except in Potter and Randall counties, where the salary shall be set by the commissioners court of each respective county.

(b) Each bailiff appointed by a judge of the 142nd, 238th, 318th, or 385th district court is entitled to receive from each county in which the court sits the amount of compensation set by the judge in an amount that does not exceed the salary of the chief deputy sheriff of the county. The judge shall give each commissioners court in the district written notification of the amount of compensation to be paid by the county.

(c) The bailiff appointed by the judge of the County Court of Harrison County is entitled to receive a salary set by the judge in an amount that does not exceed the salary of a deputy sheriff of the county. The salary is paid out of the general fund of the county.

(d) The bailiff appointed by the judge of the 341st District Court is entitled to receive a salary set by the judge in an amount that is commensurate with the salary paid the bailiffs of other courts with similar duties. The salary is paid out of the general fund of the county.

(e) A bailiff is entitled to receive from the county in which he serves a salary set by the judge in an amount that does not exceed the salary of the chief deputy sheriff of the county. The judge shall give each commissioners court in the district written notification of the amount of compensation to be paid by the county. The salary is paid out of the general fund of the county.

(f) The bailiffs and grand jury bailiffs appointed by the judges of the district courts in Tarrant County that give preference to criminal cases and the bailiffs and grand jury bailiffs appointed by the judges of the criminal district courts in Tarrant County are entitled to receive from the county general fund a salary set in writing by the judge that is in the same pay grade as the salary of certified and noncertified peace officers who are appointed as bailiffs by the sheriff. The county shall administer the bailiff salary under salary administration guidelines.

(g) Each bailiff appointed by a judge of the 15th, 59th, or 397th district court or appointed by a statutory county court judge in Grayson County is entitled to receive from the county a salary set by the judge within the budget guidelines established by the Commissioners Court of Grayson County.

(h) The bailiffs of the courts described in Section 53.002(e) are entitled to receive a salary set by the judge in an amount that does not exceed the salary of the highest paid officer assigned to patrol any of the counties in which the bailiff is designated to serve. The salary shall be apportioned by the judge between the counties in which the bailiff is designated to serve. The judge shall give each commissioners court in the district written notification of the amount of compensation to be paid by its county. The salary is paid out of the general fund of each county.

(i) Each bailiff appointed under Section 53.001(b) is entitled to receive a salary set by the commissioners court of the county in which the bailiff serves.

(j) The bailiff appointed by the judge of the 86th District Court is entitled to receive a salary set by the judge. The salary is paid out of the general fund of the county.

(k) The bailiffs of the 12th, 84th, 106th, 258th, 278th, and 411th district courts are entitled to receive a salary set by the judge and approved by the commissioners court of each of the counties in which the bailiff is designated to serve, except that the amount of the salary paid the bailiff of the 84th District Court must be commensurate with the salary paid the bailiffs of other courts with similar duties. The salary shall be apportioned by the judge among the counties in which the bailiff is designated to serve. The judge shall give each commissioners court in the district written notification of the amount of compensation to be paid by the county. The salary is paid out of the general fund of each county, except that the salary paid to the bailiff of the 106th District Court may be paid out of either the general fund or the courthouse security fund of each county.

(l) Each bailiff appointed by a judge of a district court having jurisdiction in Angelina County or a county court at law judge in Angelina County is entitled to receive a salary set by the commissioners court of that county in an amount that is not less than the salary of a deputy sheriff regularly assigned to patrol duty in the county.

(m) A bailiff of the 97th District Court that serves the court in more than one county is entitled to receive a salary set by the judge and approved by the commissioners court of each of the counties in which the bailiff is designated to serve. The salary shall be apportioned by the judge among the counties in which the bailiff is designated to serve. The judge shall give each commissioners court in the district written notification of the amount of compensation to be paid by the county.

(n) A bailiff appointed by the judge of the 130th District Court is entitled to receive a salary set by the Commissioners Court of Matagorda County in an amount that is not less than the salary of a deputy sheriff regularly assigned to patrol duty in that county.

(o) Each bailiff appointed by the judge of the 271st District Court or appointed by a county court at law judge in Wise County is entitled to receive a salary that does not exceed the salary of a lieutenant in the sheriff's department of the county. The salary is paid out of the general fund of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.29(h), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 759, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 919, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 8.03(g), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 401, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 546, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 10.01(6), eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 154, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 430, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 648, Sec. 7, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 868, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1436, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 853, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 867, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1136, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 575, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 121, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 928, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 83 (S.B. 550), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 272), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 890 (S.B. 2554), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 6.06, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 7.06, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 53.0091. COMPENSATION IN EL PASO COUNTY. (a) Each bailiff appointed under Section 53.002(c) shall be paid an annual salary out of the general fund of El Paso County, unless another source of funding is approved by the commissioners court. The council of judges shall set the salary in writing consistent with pay scales adopted by the commissioners court that are comparable to other positions within El Paso County.

(b) Bailiffs appointed under Section 53.002(c) who held office as bailiffs under that section on June 30, 2017, are entitled to receive at least the same annual salary or compensation under this section as they received on that date.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 52 (S.B. 1246), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

(d) A person appointed to succeed a bailiff who held office as bailiff under Section 53.002(c) is not entitled to be paid the same annual salary paid to the bailiff the person succeeds, but is entitled to receive an annual salary as provided by Subsection (a).

(e) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 52 (S.B. 1246), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.71(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1074, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 52 (S.B. 1246), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 52 (S.B. 1246), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. BAILIFF TO ACT AS INTERPRETER

Sec. 53.021. SPECIAL PROVISION: BAILIFF TO ACT AS INTERPRETER. (a) The judges of the 24th, 135th, and 267th district courts may each appoint, with the approval of the commissioners court, an officer of the court to serve as bailiff.

(b) The primary duty of a bailiff appointed under this section is to act as an interpreter.

(c) A bailiff appointed under this section is entitled to receive a reasonable salary not to exceed the highest salary paid to a deputy, clerk, or assistant employed by the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER C. BAILIFFS IN BEXAR COUNTY

Sec. 53.031. APPOINTMENTS. (a) The Bexar County sheriff shall appoint one deputy to serve as bailiff for each of the district courts in Bexar County not designated as giving preference to criminal cases.

(b) The Bexar County sheriff shall appoint two deputies to serve as bailiffs for each of the district courts in Bexar County designated as giving preference to criminal cases.

(c) A person appointed as bailiff must be acceptable to the judge of the court to which he is appointed.

(d) An appointment under this section is not effective until the judge approves and confirms it in writing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 53.032. OATH. Before assuming the duties of office, each bailiff must take the oath prescribed for officers of this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 53.033. BOND. The sheriff may require a bailiff to give a bond. The sheriff may prescribe the conditions and amount of the bond, or those terms may be set as otherwise provided by law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 53.034. POWERS. A bailiff appointed under this subchapter has the same powers that sheriffs and deputy sheriffs have in this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 53.035. DUTIES. (a) A bailiff acts in the name of his principal and may perform all official acts that the county sheriff may perform.

(b) A bailiff shall attend each session of the court to which he is appointed and perform the official duties performed by sheriffs and deputies in the district courts of this state, including serving process, subpoenas, warrants, and writs. A bailiff shall also perform services requested by the judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 53.036. TERM OF OFFICE; VACANCY. (a) A bailiff serves at the pleasure of the judge of the court the bailiff serves.

(b) If the office of a bailiff becomes vacant, the sheriff shall appoint another bailiff in the manner provided for initial appointments.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 53.037. ACTING FOR ANOTHER BAILIFF. The bailiffs may act for each other and shall act for each other when requested to by a judge or the sheriff. A bailiff acting for another bailiff may not receive additional compensation.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 53.038. SALARY. The sheriff shall fix the annual salary of the bailiffs of each court. The salary must be approved by the commissioners court and shall be paid by warrant or check in equal installments twice monthly from the county fund established for the purpose.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 53.039. ADDITIONAL DEPUTIES. This subchapter does not prevent the sheriff from assigning additional deputies to any of the district courts when circumstances require or when a district judge requests the assignment.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER D. BAILIFFS FOR FAMILY DISTRICT COURTS IN HARRIS COUNTY

Sec. 53.051. OFFICE OF BAILIFF. The judges of the 245th, 246th, 247th, 257th, 308th, 309th, 310th, 311th, and 312th family district courts shall appoint a person to serve their respective courts as bailiff. A bailiff is an officer of the court and performs the duties of the office under the direction and supervision of the judge of the court.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.72(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 53.052. APPOINTMENT. An order signed by the appointing judge and entered on the minutes of the court is evidence of appointment of a bailiff. The judge shall give written notice to the commissioners court and each constable of Harris County of the appointment and date employed.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.72(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 53.053. QUALIFICATIONS. A bailiff must be a citizen of the United States and must be 19 years of age.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.72(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 53.054. BAILIFF AS DEPUTY. On written notice of the appointment from the judge, a constable of said county may deputize the bailiff in addition to other deputies authorized by law.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.72(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 53.055. OATH. The following oath must be administered by the appointing judge to the bailiff appointed under this subchapter: "I solemnly swear that I will perform faithfully and impartially all duties required of me and required by law so help me God."

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.72(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 53.056. TERM OF OFFICE. The bailiff holds office at the will of the judge of the court served by the bailiff.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.72(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 53.057. DUTIES. A bailiff shall perform the duties imposed on bailiffs under the general laws of this state and the other duties required by the judge of the court served.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.72(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 53.058. COMPENSATION. The bailiff shall be compensated out of the general fund of the county in an amount to be set by the Commissioners Court of Harris County.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.72(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER E. GRAND JURY BAILIFFS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES

Sec. 53.071. GRAND JURY BAILIFFS IN COUNTIES OF 250,000 OR MORE. (a) In any county with a population of 250,000 or more, the judges of the district courts to whom the grand jury reports may, with the commissioners court's approval, appoint not more than seven grand jury bailiffs.

(b) A bailiff appointed under this section is subject to removal without cause at the will of the appointing judge or judges.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.73, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 53.072. GRAND JURY BAILIFFS IN GALVESTON COUNTY. The judge of a district court in Galveston County impaneling a grand jury shall appoint not more than six grand jury bailiffs.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.73, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.30, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER F. APPELLATE COURT PEACE OFFICERS

Sec. 53.091. EMPLOYMENT. (a) The supreme court, the court of criminal appeals, and each of the courts of appeals may employ and commission a peace officer to protect the court.

(b) A peace officer commissioned under this section holds office at the will of the court served by the officer.

(c) A person may not be commissioned as a peace officer under this section unless the person meets all standards for licensing as a peace officer by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 695, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.21, eff. May 18, 2013.

Sec. 53.092. POWERS AND DUTIES. Any peace officer commissioned under this section shall be vested with all the rights, privileges, obligations, and duties of any other peace officer in this state while on the property under the control of the court or acting in the actual course and scope of employment.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 695, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER G. BAILIFFS FOR COUNTY COURTS AT LAW

IN TARRANT COUNTY

Sec. 53.101. ASSIGNMENT OF BAILIFF. At least one bailiff shall be assigned regularly to each county court at law of Tarrant County.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.01, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.102. OFFICE OF BAILIFF; APPOINTMENT. (a) The judge of each county court at law of Tarrant County may appoint one person to serve as bailiff of that court.

(b) The bailiff is an officer of the court and performs the duties of the office under the direction and supervision of the judge of the court.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.01, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.103. TERM OF OFFICE. The bailiff holds office at the will of the judge of the court served by the bailiff.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.01, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.104. DUTIES. A bailiff shall perform the duties imposed on bailiffs under the general laws of this state and the other duties required by the judge of the court served.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.01, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.105. ASSIGNMENT OF BAILIFF BY SHERIFF. (a) If the judge of a county court at law of Tarrant County does not appoint a person to serve as bailiff under Section 53.102, the sheriff of Tarrant County shall assign a bailiff for the court on written request of the judge.

(b) A bailiff assigned by the sheriff serves at the pleasure of the court to which the bailiff is assigned and shall perform the duties required by the judge of the court.

(c) On request of the judge of a county court at law, the sheriff shall immediately assign a bailiff to the court served by the judge to fill a temporary absence of the appointed or assigned bailiff.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.01, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.106. COMPENSATION. A bailiff appointed by the judge of a county court at law of Tarrant County shall be compensated out of the general fund of the county in an amount to be set by the Commissioners Court of Tarrant County.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.01, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER H. BAILIFFS FOR FAMILY DISTRICT COURTS IN TARRANT COUNTY

Sec. 53.121. OFFICE OF BAILIFF. The judges of the 231st, 233rd, 322nd, 323rd, 324th, 325th, and 360th district courts may appoint one person to serve as bailiff of that court and one person to serve as bailiff for the district court served by an associate judge of that district court. A bailiff is an officer of the court and performs the duties of the office under the direction and supervision of the judge of the court.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.122. APPOINTMENT. An order signed by the appointing judge and entered on the minutes of the court is evidence of appointment of a bailiff. The judge shall give written notice to the commissioners court and each constable of Tarrant County of the appointment and date employed.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.123. QUALIFICATIONS. A bailiff must be a citizen of the United States and must be 18 years of age or older.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.124. BAILIFF AS DEPUTY. On written notice of the appointment from the judge, a constable of the county may deputize the bailiff in addition to other deputies authorized by law.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.125. OATH. The following oath must be administered by the appointing judge to the bailiff appointed under this subchapter: "I solemnly swear that I will perform faithfully and impartially all duties required of me and required by law so help me God."

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.126. TERM OF OFFICE. The bailiff holds office at the will of the judge of the court served by the bailiff.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.127. DUTIES. A bailiff shall perform the duties imposed on bailiffs under the general laws of this state and the other duties required by the judge of the court served.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 53.128. COMPENSATION. The bailiff shall be compensated out of the general fund of the county in an amount to be set by the Commissioners Court of Tarrant County.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2015.